Illinois, session 104th, HB2596.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 103-2.2 and by adding Section 6103-2.3 as follows: 7    (725 ILCS 5/103-2.2)8    Sec. 103-2.2. Prohibition of deceptive tactics against 9protected persons.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Custodial interrogation" means any interrogation during 12which (i) a reasonable person in the subject's position would 13consider himself or herself to be in custody and (ii) during 14which a question is asked that is reasonably likely to elicit 15an incriminating response.16    "Deception" means the knowing communication of false facts 17about evidence or unauthorized statements regarding leniency 18by a law enforcement officer or juvenile officer to a subject 19of custodial interrogation.20    "Place of detention" means a building or a police station 21that is a place of operation for a municipal police department 22or county sheriff department or other law enforcement agency, 23not a courthouse, that is owned or operated by a law   HB2596- 2 -LRB104 09231 RLC 19288 b1enforcement agency at which persons are or may be held in 2detention in connection with criminal charges against those 3persons.4    "Protected person" means: a minor who, at the time of the 5commission of the offense, was under 18 years of age; or a 6person with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 7    (b) An oral, written, or sign language confession of a 8protected person made as a result of a custodial interrogation 9conducted at a police station or other place of detention on or 10after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 11General Assembly shall be presumed to be inadmissible as 12evidence against the protected person making the confession in 13a criminal proceeding or a juvenile court proceeding for an 14act that if committed by an adult would be a misdemeanor 15offense under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or a 16felony offense under the Criminal Code of 2012 if, during the 17custodial interrogation, a law enforcement officer or juvenile 18officer knowingly engages in deception.19    (c) The presumption of inadmissibility of a confession of 20a protected person at a custodial interrogation at a police 21station or other place of detention, when such confession is 22procured through the knowing use of deception, may be overcome 23by a preponderance of the evidence that the confession was 24voluntarily given, based on the totality of the circumstances.25    (d) The burden of going forward with the evidence and the 26burden of proving that a confession was voluntary shall be on   HB2596- 3 -LRB104 09231 RLC 19288 b1the State. Objection to the failure of the State to call all 2material witnesses on the issue of whether the confession was 3voluntary must be made in the trial court.4(Source: P.A. 102-101, eff. 1-1-22; 103-341, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    (725 ILCS 5/103-2.3 new)6    Sec. 103-2.3. Prohibition of deceptive tactics.7    (a) In this Section:8    "Custodial interrogation" means any interrogation during 9which (i) a reasonable person in the subject's position would 10consider himself or herself to be in custody and (ii) during 11which a question is asked that is reasonably likely to elicit 12an incriminating response.13    "Deception" means the knowing communication of false facts 14about evidence or unauthorized statements regarding leniency 15by a law enforcement officer to a subject of custodial 16interrogation.17    "Place of detention" means a building or a police station 18that is a place of operation for a municipal police department 19or county sheriff department or other law enforcement agency, 20not a courthouse, that is owned or operated by a law 21enforcement agency at which persons are or may be held in 22detention in connection with criminal charges against those 23persons. 24    (b) An oral, written, or sign language confession of a 25person made as a result of a custodial interrogation conducted   HB2596- 4 -LRB104 09231 RLC 19288 b1at a police station or other place of detention on or after the 2effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 3Assembly is presumed to be inadmissible as evidence against 4the person making the confession in a criminal proceeding for 5an act that would be a misdemeanor offense under Article 11 of 6the Criminal Code of 2012 or a felony offense under the 7Criminal Code of 2012 if, during the custodial interrogation, 8a law enforcement officer knowingly engages in deception.9    (c) The presumption of inadmissibility of a confession of 10a person at a custodial interrogation at a police station or 11other place of detention, when such confession is procured 12through the knowing use of deception, may be overcome by a 13preponderance of the evidence that the confession was 14voluntarily given, based on the totality of the circumstances.15    (d) The burden of going forward with the evidence and the 16burden of proving that a confession was voluntary is on the 17State. Objection to the failure of the State to call all 18material witnesses on the issue of whether the confession was 19voluntary must be made in the trial court.